zh-CN: 适用指板弧度: 10 英寸; 12 英寸; 14 英寸; 15.75 英寸; 16 英寸; 7.25 英寸; 9.5 英寸; 复合弧度; 平坦; 通用/灵活; 其他
pt-BR: Raio de escala compatível: 10"; 12"; 14"; 15,75"; 16"; 7,25"; 9,5"; Raio composto; Plano; Universal / flexível; Outro
hu: Kompatibilis fogólap sugara: 10"; 12"; 14"; 15.75"; 16"; 7.25"; 9.5"; Kombinált rádiusz; Lapos; Univerzális / rugalmas; Egyéb
ro-RO: Raza tastaturii compatibile: 10"; 12"; 14"; 15,75"; 16"; 7,25"; 9,5"; Rază compusă; Plat; Universal / flexibil; Altele
bg-BG: Съвместим радиус на грифа: 10"; 12"; 14"; 15,75"; 16"; 7,25"; 9,5"; Комбиниран радиус; Плосък; Универсален / гъвкав; Други
th: ความโค้งมนของฟิงเกอร์บอร์ดที่เข้ากันได้: 10 นิ้ว; 12 นิ้ว; 14 นิ้ว; 15.75 นิ้ว; 16 นิ้ว; 7.25 นิ้ว; 9.5 นิ้ว; รัศมีแบบคอมปาวด์; แบน; อเนกประสงค์/ยืดหยุ่นได้; อื่นๆ
ko: 호환 핑거보드 반경: 10인치; 12인치; 14인치; 15.75인치; 16인치; 7.25인치; 9.5인치; 컴파운드 곡률; 플랫; 범용/유연함; 기타
en: Compatible fingerboard radius: 10"; 12"; 14"; 15.75"; 16"; 7.25"; 9.5"; Compound radius; Flat; Universal / flexible; Other
ja: 対応指板半径: 10インチ; 12インチ; 14インチ; 15.75インチ; 16インチ; 7.25インチ; 9.5インチ; コンパウンドラジアス; フラット; 汎用 / フレキシブル; その他
sl-SI: Združljiv radij prstne rolke: 10"; 12"; 14"; 15,75"; 16"; 7,25"; 9,5"; Sestavljen radij; Raven; Univerzalen/prilagodljiv; Drugo
sk-SK: Kompatibilný polomer zakrivenia hmatníka: 10"; 12"; 14"; 15,75"; 16"; 7,25"; 9,5"; Zložený rádius; Plochý; Univerzálny/flexibilný; Iné
cs: Kompatibilní poloměr hmatníku: 10"; 12"; 14"; 15,75"; 16"; 7,25"; 9,5"; Složený poloměr; Plochý; Univerzální / flexibilní; Jiné
nb: Kompatibel fingerbrettradius: 10"; 12"; 14"; 15,75"; 16"; 7,25"; 9,5"; Sammensatt radius; Flat; Universell / fleksibel; Annet
pl: Zgodny promień fingerboardu: 10"; 12"; 14"; 15,75"; 16"; 7,25"; 9,5"; Zmienny promień; Płaski; Uniwersalny / elastyczny; Inne
de: Kompatibler Radius des Griffbretts: 10"; 12"; 14"; 15,75"; 16"; 7,25"; 9,5"; Compound-Radius; Flach; Universal/flexibel; Sonstige
es: Radio del diapasón: 10"; 12"; 14"; 15,75"; 16"; 7,25"; 9,5"; Radio compuesto; Plano; Universal/flexible; Otro
el: Συμβατή ακτίνα ταστιέρας: 10"; 12"; 14"; 15.75"; 16"; 7.25"; 9.5"; Σύνθετη ακτίνα; Επίπεδη; Γενικής χρήσης / εύκαμπτη; Άλλο
tr: Uyumlu klavye yarıçapı: 10 inç; 12 inç; 14 inç; 15,75 inç; 16 inç; 7,25 inç; 9,5 inç; Bileşik yarıçap; Düz; Evrensel / esnek; Diğer
lt-LT: Suderinamo spindulio žaislinė riedlentė: 10 col.; 12 col.; 14 col.; 15,75 col.; 16 col.; 7,25 col.; 9,5 col.; Kintamas spindulys; Plokščias; Universalus / lankstus; Kita
ru: Совместимый радиус накладки грифа: 10"; 12"; 14"; 15,75"; 16"; 7,25"; 9,5"; Составной радиус; Плоский; Универсальный / гибкий; Другое
da: Kompatibel fingerbrætradius: 10"; 12"; 14"; 15,75"; 16"; 7,25"; 9,5"; Compound-radius; Flad; Universal/fleksibel; Andet
it: Raggio della tastiera compatibile: 10"; 12"; 14"; 15,75"; 16"; 7,25"; 9,5"; Raggio composto; Piatta; Universale / flessibile; Altro
fi: Yhteensopivan otelaudan säde: 10"; 12"; 14"; 15,75"; 16"; 7,25"; 9,5"; Muuttuva säde; Tasainen; Universaali / joustava; Muu
fr: Compatible fingerboard radius: 10 po; 12 po; 14 po; 15,75 po; 16 po; 7,25 po; 9,5 po; Rayon composé; Plat; Universel / flexible; Autre
sv: Kompatibel fingerboard-radie: 10"; 12"; 14"; 15,75"; 16"; 7,25"; 9,5"; Kombinerad radie; Platt; Universell/flexibel; Annat
hr-HR: Kompatibilan radijus vrata glazbala: 10"; 12"; 14"; 15,75"; 16"; 7,25"; 9,5"; Kombinirani radijus; Ravno; Univerzalno / fleksibilno; Ostalo
vi: Bán kính mặt phím tương thích: 10"; 12"; 14"; 15,75"; 16"; 7,25"; 9,5"; Bán kính phức hợp; Phẳng; Đa năng / linh hoạt; Khác
zh-TW: 相容指板弧度: 10"; 12"; 14"; 15.75"; 16"; 7.25"; 9.5"; 複合半徑; 平面; 通用 / 彈性; 其他
pt-PT: Raio da escala compatível: 10 pol.; 12 pol.; 14 pol.; 15,75 pol.; 16 pol.; 7,25 pol.; 9,5 pol.; Raio composto; Plano; Universal/flexível; Outro
nl: Compatibele toetsradius: 10"; 12"; 14"; 15,75"; 16"; 7,25"; 9,5"; Compound-radius; Plat; Universeel / flexibel; Overig